apertium-yid.yid.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Yiddish

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>    ! Noun
%<v%>    ! Verb
%<vaux%> ! Auxiliary
%<det%>  ! Determiner
%<prn%>  ! Pronoun
%<pr%>   ! Preposition
%<det%>  ! Determiner
%<adv%>  ! Adverb
%<adj%>  ! Adjective
%<preadv%> ! Preadverb
%<cnjcoo%> ! Coordinating conjunction
%<cnjsub%> ! Subordinating conjunction
%<cnjadv%> ! Conjunctive adverb
%<np%>   ! Proper noun
%<title%>  ! title
%<num%>  ! Numeral

! types of pronouns, determiners, and adjectives
%<pers%> ! personal
%<pos%>  ! personal possessive
%<ref%>  ! reflexive
%<attr%> ! attributive ("prepositive")
%<pred%> ! predicative ("postpositive", nominalised)
%<itg%>  ! interrogative
%<comp%> ! Comparative
%<sup%>  ! Superlative
%<qnt%>  ! Quantifier

! number: for nouns, verbs, adjectives, determiners, etc.
%<pl%>   ! Plural
%<sg%>   ! Singular

! definiteness
%<def%>  ! Definite
%<ind%>  ! Indefinite

! gender: for nouns, determiners, adjectives, etc.
%<m%>    ! masculine
%<f%>    ! feminine
%<nt%>   ! neuter
%<mfn%>  ! masculine/feminine/neuter

! person
%<p1%>   ! 1st person
%<p2%>   ! 2nd person
%<p3%>   ! 3rd person
%<impers%> ! impersonal

! cases: for determiners, pronouns, etc.
%<nom%>  ! nominative
%<acc%>  ! accusative
%<dat%>  ! dative

! verb forms
%<inf%>  ! infinitive
%<pres%> ! present
%<pp%>   ! past participle
%<pprs%> ! present participle
%<imp%>  ! imperative

! Proper noun types
%<top%>  ! topographic (places)
%<ant%>  ! anthroponyms (given names)
%<cog%>  ! cognomens (family names)
%<org%>  ! organisations

! Punctuation
%<percent%>   ! Percent
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)
%<ltr%>       ! Letter

! Misc

%<ord%>       ! Ordinal

! Escaped characters

%>       ! morpheme boundary
%.
%,

№
%-
%  
%+
%−

%{ь%}    ! used for umlaut of ~previous vowel for verbs
%{ь2%}   ! used for umlaut of ~previous vowel for adjectives
%{ױ%}    ! for ױ to ײ umlaut correspondence
%{ע%}    ! ע or empty; in -{ע}ן is empty except after נ and ל
%{ס%}    ! ס in סט superlative, deletes after other ס
%{ן%}    ! ן sometimes ם

! matched features
%[%+pp%] ! past participle
%[%-pp%] ! past participle

%[%+→on%]
%[%-→on%]
%[%+←on%]
%[%-←on%]
%[√on%]


! Regular umlaut correspondences:
! ו - י
! אָ - ע
! ױ - ײ/ײַ
! אַ - ע
אַ
אָ
ײַ
יִ
וּ
בּ
בֿ
כּ
כֿ
פֿ
פּ
תּ
יי
וו
וי
ייִ


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;
DetRoot ;
VerbRoot ;
Conjunctions ;
Prepositions ;
Pronouns ;
Punctuation ;
Adverbs ;
Adjectives ;
ProperNouns ;
Titles ;
Numerals ;
Digits ;     ! Use/Circ


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!==============================================================================!
!
!                               N U M E R A L S
!
!    WARNING: This section should not be modified without consultation.
!             Test cases are not yet in dev/numerals.
!==============================================================================!

LEXICON SQRD
! This lexicon includes common ways of writing squared, cubed etc.

²%<num%>:2 # ;  ! Dir/LR
³%<num%>:3 # ;  ! Dir/LR
²%<num%>:² # ;
³%<num%>:³ # ;
%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>: # ;

! FIXME: find some way to make these generate!
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>סט ADJ-INFL-ENDINGS ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>ט ADJ-INFL-ENDINGS ;  ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<percent%>:%% # ;

°С%<num%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR

°%<num%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR


! Measurement units

ק%"מ:ק%"מ SQRD ;  ! "kilometres"
                ! FIXME: add more

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1                     NUM-DIGIT ; !
2:2                     NUM-DIGIT ; !
3:3                     NUM-DIGIT ; !
4:4                     NUM-DIGIT ; !
5:5                     NUM-DIGIT ; !
6:6                     NUM-DIGIT ; !
7:7                     NUM-DIGIT ; !
8:8                     NUM-DIGIT ; !
9:9                     NUM-DIGIT ; !

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0                 NUM-DIGIT ; !
2%0:2%0                 NUM-DIGIT ; !
3%0:3%0                 NUM-DIGIT ; !
4%0:4%0                 NUM-DIGIT ; !
5%0:5%0                 NUM-DIGIT ; !
6%0:6%0                 NUM-DIGIT ; !
7%0:7%0                 NUM-DIGIT ; !
8%0:8%0                 NUM-DIGIT ; !
9%0:9%0                 NUM-DIGIT ; !

LEXICON POWERS

%0%0:%0%0               NUM-DIGIT ; !
%0%0%0:%0%0%0           ִNUM-DIGIT ; !

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%,:%, POWERS ;
%.:%. POWERS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

!==============================================================================!
!          N U M E R A L     L E X I C O N     E N D S     H E R E
!==============================================================================!



!!! Format for noun lexica is N-[gender]-[class]
!!! gender: M, F, N
!!! class: UML, UML-ER, S, N, NULL, HEB

LEXICON N-M-UML

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{ь%} # ;

LEXICON N-F-UML

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%{ь%} # ;

LEXICON N-M-UML-ER

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{ь%}ער # ;

LEXICON N-F-UML-ER

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{ь%}ער # ;

LEXICON N-N-UML-ER

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:%>%{ь%}ער # ;

LEXICON N-M-S

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>ס # ;

LEXICON N-F-S

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>ס # ;

LEXICON N-N-S

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:%>ס # ;

LEXICON N-M-N

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{ע%}ן # ;

LEXICON N-F-N

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%{ע%}ן # ;

LEXICON N-N-N

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:%{ע%}ן # ;

LEXICON N-M-NULL

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>: # ;

LEXICON N-F-NULL

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>: # ;

LEXICON N-N-NULL

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>: # ;

LEXICON N-M-HEB

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:ים # ;

LEXICON N-M-HEB-N

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:נים # ;

LEXICON N-M-NOPL

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: # ;

LEXICON N-F-NOPL

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>: # ;

LEXICON N-F-HEB

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>:ה # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:ות # ;

LEXICON N-M-REBE

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ן # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ן # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:ס # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:ים # ; ! (Hebrew plural) Dir/LR

LEXICON DET-DEF-M

%<det%>%<def%>%<m%>%<nom%>:ער # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<m%>%<acc%>:עם # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<m%>%<dat%>:עם # ;

LEXICON DET-DEF-F

%<det%>%<def%>%<f%>%<nom%>:י # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<f%>%<acc%>:י # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<f%>%<dat%>:ער # ;

LEXICON DET-DEF-N

%<det%>%<def%>%<nt%>%<nom%>:אָס # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<nt%>%<acc%>:אָס # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<nt%>%<dat%>:עם # ;

LEXICON DET-DEF-PL

%<det%>%<def%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:י # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:י # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:י # ;

LEXICON DET-INDEF

%<det%>%<ind%>%<sg%>: # ;
! FIXME: deal with alternate אַן

LEXICON V-FINAL-PARTICLE

# ;  ! non-particle verbs
%[%+→on%]:%#% אָן # ;

LEXICON V-INITIAL-PARTICLE

# ;  ! non-particle verbs
%[%+←on%]: # ;

LEXICON NounRoot
אַפּריל:אַפּריל N-M-N ; ! "April"
אַרבעט:אַרבעט N-F-S ; ! "work"
אָקטאָבער:אָקטאָבער N-M-S ; ! "October"
אױגוסט:אױגוסט N-M-N ; ! "August" CHECK: PL in N?
אײַזנבאַן:אײַזנבאַן N-F-N ; ! "railroad"
בּאַן:בּאַן N-F-N ; ! "train, railroad"
בּאַרג:בּאַרג N-M-UML ; ! "mountain"
בּױם:בּ%{ױ%}ם N-M-UML-ER ; ! "tree" plural with ײ
באַפֿעלקערונג:באַפֿעלקערונג N-F-N ; ! "population"
בוך:בוך N-N-UML-ER ; ! "book"
געלט:געלט N-N-UML-ER ; ! "money"  NOTE: no umlaut [possible]
געשיכטע:געשיכטע N-F-S ; ! "history"
דעצעמבער:דעצעמבער N-M-S ; ! "December"
דעצעמבער:דעצעמבער N-M-S ; ! "December"
דרום:דרום N-M-NOPL ; ! "south"
הימל:הימל N-M-N ; ! "heaven"
היסטאָריע:היסטאָריע N-F-S ; ! "history"
הױז:הױז N-N-UML-ER ; ! "house" plural with ײַ
זון:זון N-F-N ; ! "sun"
זון:זון N-M-UML ; ! "son"
חסיד:חסיד N-M-HEB ; ! "khosid (Hassid)"
חתונה:חתונ N-F-HEB ; ! "wedding"
טאָג:טאָג N-M-UML ; ! "day"
טאָכטער:טאָכטער N-F-UML ; ! "daughter"
טײל:טײל N-F-N ; ! "part"
יאַנואַר:יאַנואַר N-M-N ; ! "January"
יאָר:יאָר N-M-N ; ! "year"
יולי:יולי N-M-S ; ! "July"
יוני:יוני N-M-S ; ! "June"
ייִד:איד N-M-N ; ! "Jew" ! Dir/LR
ייִד:ייִד N-M-N ; ! "Jew"
ישיבה:ישיב N-F-HEB ; ! "yeshiva"
לאַן:לאַן N-M-N ; ! "meadow"
לאַנד:לאַנד N-N-UML-ER ; ! "country, land"
לעבן:לעבן N-N-S ; ! "life"
מאַרץ:מאַרץ N-M-N ; ! "March"
מזרח:מזרח N-M-NOPL ; ! "east"
מיטן:מיטן N-M-S ; ! "middle"
מלחמה:מלחמ N-F-HEB ; ! "war"
מענטש:מענטש N-M-N ; ! "human; mentsh, gentleman"
מערבֿ:מערבֿ N-M-NOPL ; ! "west"
מײַ:מײַ N-N-N ; ! "May" CHECK: PL in N?
נאָמען:נאָמען N-M-UML ; ! "name"  ! FIXME: irreg alternative plural נעמענער
נאָװעמבער:נאָװעמבער N-M-S ; ! "November"
סטאַנציע:סטאַנציע N-F-S ; ! "station"
סעפּטעמבער:סעפּטעמבער N-M-S ; ! "September" CHECK: PL in S?
ספֿר:ספֿר N-M-HEB ; ! "seyfer (religious book)"
פּאָיעזד:פּאָיעזד N-M-N ; ! "train"
פֿאָטער:פֿאָטער N-M-S ; ! "father"
פֿעברואַר:פֿעברואַר N-M-N ; ! "February" CHECK: PL in N?
פֿרײַנד:פֿרײַנד N-M-NULL ; ! "friend"
צוג:צוג N-M-N ; ! "train"
צפֿון:צפֿון N-M-NOPL ; ! "north"
צײַט:צײַט N-F-N ; ! "time"
קאַלענדאָר:קאַלענדאַר N-M-N ; ! "calendar"
קינד:קינד N-N-UML-ER ; ! "child" (technically no umlaut)
קריג:קריג N-F-N ; ! "war"
רבֿ:רבֿ N-M-HEB-N ; ! "rov (rabbi)" (pl: rabonem)
רבי:רבי N-M-REBE ; ! "rebe (rabbi)"
רעגירונג:רעגירונג N-F-N ; ! "government"
שטאַט:שטאַט N-M-N ; ! "state"
שטאָט:שטאָט N-F-UML ; ! "city"
שװעסטער:שװעסטער N-F-NULL ; ! "sister"
תּורה:תּורה N-F-NOPL ; ! "Torah (Hebrew bible)"
װאַסער:װאַסער N-N-N ; ! "water"
װעג:װעג N-M-N ; ! "way"
װעלט:װעלט N-F-N ; ! "world"
